Washington statutes.
RCW 17.10.350

Infraction—Penalty.

(1) Any person found to have committed a civil infraction under this chapter shall be assessed a monetary penalty not to exceed one thousand dollars. The state noxious weed control board shall adopt a schedule of monetary penalties for each violation of this chapter classified as a civil infraction and submit the schedule to the appropriate court. If a monetary penalty is imposed by the court, the penalty is immediately due and payable. The court may, at its discretion, grant an extension of time, not to exceed thirty days, in which the penalty must be paid.

(2) Failure to pay any monetary penalties imposed under this chapter is punishable as a misdemeanor.

[ 2003 c 53 s 117; 1997 c 353 s 31; 1987 c 438 s 28.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.